Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.080

Administration costs—Allocation.

All costs allocable to the administration of this chapter shall be charged to and paid to the OASI revolving fund by the participating divisions and instrumentalities of the state pro rata according to their respective contributions.

[ 2009 c 171 s 2; 1951 c 184 s 9.]